California statutes. Public Resources Code
In a district containing an improvement district the directors and all of the officers of the district each respectively has all the rights, powers, and privileges as to the improvement district, its real property, and the proceedings in relation to the improvement district that each respectively has for the district of which the improvement district is a part including the right of the district to acquire, own, and hold property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9862.

The directors may also hold property used or acquired in connection with the improvement in the name of the directors and their successors in office as trustees for the improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9863.

The directors of a district in which an improvement district exists may allow on terms that may be agreed upon any person to carry water through any conduit for the improvement of which the improvement district was formed and may cancel the right in the event that payments are not made in accordance with the agreed terms.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9864.

The work of improvement provided for in this chapter and the purchase of all supplies, material, and equipment therefor shall be performed by the district, or in the discretion of the directors contracts may be made for the work and material after notice calling for bids, as prescribed by the directors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9865.

The directors may, in lieu in whole or in part of levying assessments for the operation of improvement district works, fix and collect reasonable charges for the use of water or for any other service furnished by means of the improvement district works.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9866.

All such tolls, connections charges, and additional assessments shall be held and applied upon and reduce the last installment or installments of the improvement district assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9867.

The directors may provide for the maintenance and operation of the works of an improvement district from the funds of the resource conservation district in lieu of levying further improvement district assessments for such purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9868.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the directors of a district in which an improvement district exists may establish facilities use charges for the use of the facilities in such improvement district and, in establishing such charges, may provide that water shall be furnished or delivered through such facilities only to lands and real property in such improvement district in respect of which such facilities use charges or annual installments thereof, fixed as provided in this section, shall have been paid in advance. Such facilities use charges shall be in amounts equal to the respective amounts of the assessments theretofore levied against the real property in such improvement district for the purpose of providing such facilities. In establishing such charges the directors shall provide (a) that payment in full of any such assessment shall constitute payment in advance in full of such facilities use charge; (b) that all facilities use charges not so paid in advance in full shall be payable in annual installments, each such annual installment to be equal in amount to (i) the annual installment of the unpaid assessment theretofore levied against the real property in respect of which such charge is payable and due on or before the next succeeding November 20th plus interest thereon at the rate provided in the order levying such assessment plus 10 percent in addition (added for anticipated delinquencies), plus (ii) all delinquent annual installments, if any, of such unpaid assessment together with penalties and interest at said rate on such delinquent installments; and (c) that payment of any annual installment of any such facilities use charge shall constitute payment in full of the annual installment of such unpaid assessment due on or before the next succeeding November 20th and of all delinquent annual installments, if any, of such unpaid assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9869.

On behalf of an improvement district the directors may do any or all acts necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of the improvement district, including, but not limited to any or all of the following:

(a) Acquire without cost to the United States such land, easements, or rights-of-way as will be needed in connection with improvements installed or constructed with the financial assistance of the United States;

(b) Assume such share of the cost of installing or constructing any improvements involving the financial assistance of the United States as are equitable in consideration of the anticipated benefits from such improvements;

(c) Defray the costs of operation and maintenance of such works of improvement in accordance with such terms as may be agreed upon;

(d) Acquire, or provide assurance that the district, the improvement district, or the owners of real property have acquired, such water rights as may be needed in the installation and operation of the work of improvment;

(e) Obtain agreements to carry out soil conservation measures and proper farm plans from owners of real property in connection with such a work of improvement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9870.

On behalf of an improvement district, the directors may cooperate and contract with the United States, or with any officer, department, bureau, or agency thereof, to accomplish any of the purposes of the improvement district, or to exercise any of the powers of the directors in relation to such improvement districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Improvement District Warrants [9881. - 9890.]

9881.

A district may issue improvement district warrants signed by its president and secretary in face amount not exceeding in the aggregate the cost of the improvements exclusive of interest and amounts paid prior to the issuance of these warrants on the assessment levied to pay for the improvement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.

Improvement district warrants shall be made payable in amounts and at the times corresponding substantially to the amounts and times of payment of the installments of the improvement district assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9883.

Improvement district warrants shall bear interest at the rate fixed at the time of the levy of the improvement district assessment, and the interest may be made payable semiannually.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.

Coupons for the interest on these warrants may be attached to them.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9885.

Improvement district warrants may be made payable to any of the following:

(a) Bearer.

(b) Persons furnishing work, labor, or material.

(c) The contractor if the work of improvement is to be done under contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9886.

Improvement district warrants may be sold by the district for not less than par at either public or private sale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9887.

Any surplus funds and any money held by a district in a sinking or depreciation fund may in the discretion of its directors be invested in the warrants of any improvement district within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the cost of constructing, acquiring, or improving works of an improvement district shall be paid only out of the proceeds of an improvement district assessment levied upon and collected from the real property in the improvement district for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.

Improvement district warrants shall be paid only out of the proceeds of an improvement district assessment levied upon and collected from the real property within the improvement district for improvement purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9890.

Improvement district warrants or their proceeds shall be used solely for making the improvements for which the improvement district was formed and the necessary incidental expenses.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Advance Payment of Assessments [9901. - 9905.]

9901.

At any time before improvement district warrants are issued, the amount of any improvement district assessment on any real property, exclusive of interest and the 10 percent added for anticipated delinquencies, may be paid in money to the treasurer of the principal county of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9902.

Real property on which the amount of the improvement district assessment has been paid pursuant to Section 9901 shall not be subject to the annual installments of the assessments levied for the purposes of the improvement, but it shall be and remain liable for any assessments levied for operation and for any supplemental or additional improvement district assessments levied.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9903.

Any owner of real property of an improvement district who desires at any time to lessen or remove the lien upon his real property of any improvement district assessment may deliver to the treasurer of the principal county for cancellation warrants payable out of the assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9904.

The directors may require warrants delivered to lessen or remove an improvement district assessment lien to be substantially of the average maturities of the issue of warrants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9905.

The treasurer of the principal county shall notify the directors of the amount of the principal and interest due and to become due on the warrants delivered for cancellation. The directors shall thereupon cause the proper cancellation and proper record and credit to be made against the improvement district assessment on the real property of the person delivering the warrants.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Proceedings [9911. - 9912.]

9911.

All acts, proceedings, conclusions, and findings of fact, including the levy of an assessment, by the directors of a district concerning an improvement district therein shall be conclusive except in an action or proceeding instituted within six months after the acts, proceedings, conclusions, or findings were had or made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9912.

An action to determine the validity of an assessment or of any warrants may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dissolution of Improvement Districts [9921. - 9924.]

9921.

At any time prior to the incurring of any indebtedness or upon the full payment of all indebtedness of an improvement district, a petition, signed and acknowledged by not less than the number of owners of real property constituting the improvement district required to sign a petition to form the improvement district, may be filed with the directors requesting that the improvement district be dissolved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9922.

A hearing on dissolution shall be had in the same manner and after the same notice as is required for the formation of an improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9923.

The directors may, after the hearing, order the improvement district dissolved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9924.

The order of dissolution shall be recorded in the same manner as the order forming the improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Tahoe Resource Conservation District [9951. - 9953.]

9951.

The Tahoe Resource Conservation District is hereby created to consist of those parts of the Counties of Placer and El Dorado lying within the Tahoe Basin adjacent to Lake Tahoe and that additional and adjacent part of the County of Placer outside of the Tahoe Basin which lies southward and eastward of a line starting at the intersection of the basin crestline and the north boundary of Section 1, thence west to the northwest corner of Section 3, thence south to the intersection of the basin crestline and the west boundary of Section 10; all sections referring to Township 15 North, Range 16 East, M.D.B. & M. The district lands defined and described herein shall be as precisely delineated on official maps of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9952.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the organization and functions of the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(b) The initial Board of Directors of the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall be composed of the following five persons who shall each be an owner of land within the area described in Section 9951:

(1) One person appointed by the California Tahoe Regional Planning Agency who may be a member of that agency.

(2) One person appointed by the City of South Lake Tahoe.

(3) One person appointed by the Board of Supervisors of El Dorado County.

(4) Two persons appointed by the Board of Supervisors of Placer County.

(c) Successors to the members of the initial board of directors shall be elected at a general resource conservation district election in accordance with this division.

(d) Moneys received by a resource conservation district pursuant to Section 9505 on lands transferred to the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall be transferred to the Tahoe Resource Conservation District, and all costs of establishing the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall be a first charge on those funds. The Board of Directors of the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall determine whether the treasury of Placer County or of El Dorado County shall be the depository of the funds of the Tahoe Resource Conservation District for the purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 9521) of Chapter 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 68, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9953.

It is not the intent of the Legislature that the Tahoe Resource Conservation District shall in any way affect the responsibilities, authority, and jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, the California Tahoe Conservancy Agency, or the Tahoe Conservancy Agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Suisun Resource Conservation District [9960. - 9965.]

9960.

The following definitions shall govern the interpretation of this chapter:

(a) “Suisun Marsh” means the Suisun Marsh as defined in Section 29101.

(b) “Primary management area” means the primary management area as defined in Section 29102.

(c) “Suisun Marsh Protection Plan” means the plan identified and defined in Section 29113.

(d) “District” means the Suisun Resource Conservation District.

(e) “Board” means the board of directors of the district.

(f) “Individual ownership” means a separate privately owned parcel of land within the primary management area. Contiguous parcels of land owned by the same legal entity comprise a single individual ownership.

(g) “Department” means the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1571, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9961.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, the organization, powers, and functions of the district shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

9962.

(a) The district shall have primary local responsibility for regulating and improving water management practices on privately owned lands within the primary management area of the Suisun Marsh in conformity with Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000) and the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan.

(b) The district shall issue regulations requiring compliance with any water management plan or program for privately owned lands within the primary management area if the plan or program has been prepared by the district and approved and certified by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission as a component of the local protection program required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 19.

(c) Following certification of the district’s component of the local protection program by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the board or its employees may, after approval by a vote of four-fifths of the membership of the board, obtain an inspection warrant pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure and enter onto privately owned lands within the primary management area for the purpose of determining whether or not the landowner is complying with the regulations of the district. Following a determination that a landowner is violating the regulations, and after written notice to the landowner, the board may request the District Attorney of the County of Solano to take appropriate action.

(d) The first violation by any person of any district regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). A subsequent violation of the same district regulation by the same person shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(e) The civil penalties prescribed in this section shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the District Attorney of the County of Solano. Such an action shall take precedence over all other civil matters on the calendar, except those matters to which equal precedence on the calendar is granted by law. Any penalty collected under this section shall be paid to the Treasurer of the County of Solano and shall be credited one-half to the county general fund and one-half to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1571, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9963.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 9803, the formation of an improvement district within the primary management area may be proposed and the petition therefor may be signed by a majority of the members of the board. Thereafter, proceedings with regard to the formation of the proposed improvement district shall be in accordance with Sections 9804 through 9821, inclusive. However, wherever “petition” is used in those provisions, it shall be deemed to refer to the petition of the majority of the members of the board; and, notwithstanding Section 9817, the petition shall not be required to be dismissed unless more than one-half of the holders of title to the real property within the proposed improvement district object to its formation or the levy of the proposed assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

9964.

The district may, with the consent of the owner, levy special assessments on the lands of the consenting owner within the district pursuant to the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code) or the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code) and issue bonds to represent unpaid assessments pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) to finance the construction of improvements on those lands as provided by Section 9409.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) or Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code, the district may contract for the construction of these improvements without inviting public bids therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1571, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9965.

(a) The Legislature finds that compliance with the mandated regulations of the district will produce public benefits by improving wildlife habitat in the primary management area and that providing public funds to partially offset the costs of complying with those regulations would serve a valid public purpose. Assistance under this section shall not be treated as taxable income to a private landowner.

(b) Each year the district shall submit to the department an estimate of an amount sufficient to reimburse the private landowners in the primary management area for 50 percent of the operation and maintenance costs which it anticipates they will incur the following fiscal year in carrying out this chapter and Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000). Funds for this purpose shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per individual ownership. The funds shall be included in the budget of the department payable from the Wildlife Restoration Fund and shall be available to the department for disbursement to the private landowners in accordance with subdivision (c).

(c) Each fiscal year, any private landowner in the primary management area who desires to qualify for the assistance provided by this section shall, by December 31, submit to the district a claim for those costs incurred that calendar year in carrying out the operation and maintenance activities specified in that landowner’s individual ownership management program. Each claim shall be accompanied by substantiating documents, as determined by the district. The district shall review each claim to determine its appropriateness by, including, but not limited to, an onsite inspection to establish that the physical improvements or management procedures for which a claim is submitted have been satisfactorily completed. The district shall submit the individual ownership claims to the department for review and approval for payment equal to 50 percent of each claim. However, no payment shall exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). In any fiscal year in which the funds appropriated for purposes of this section are insufficient to pay 50 percent of each claim, the department shall pay all approved claims on a pro rata basis. In any fiscal year in which no funds are appropriated for purposes of this section, the department shall pay no claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Ventura County Resource Conservation District [9970. - 9972.]

9970.

The provisions of this chapter apply only to the Ventura County Resource Conservation District. For the purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Ventura County Resource Conservation District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 233.)
-------------------------------------------

9971.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the organization and functions of the district shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 233.)
-------------------------------------------

9972.

Whenever any territory in the district is included in a city by reason of incorporation or annexation, that territory may be excluded from the district upon the effective date of its inclusion in the city, subject only to compliance by the district with the requirements of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

Upon the exclusion of such territory, all unencumbered funds standing to the credit of the area upon the date of its exclusion shall be divided between the city and the district in proportion to the assessed value of real property of the territory excluded and the portion remaining. For the purpose of this section, “unencumbered funds” means a sum of money consisting of uncollected taxes, including taxes levied and collected for the territory on property withdrawn after the date of exclusion, and other uncollected amounts belonging to or due such territory, that is in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all claims and accounts against the territory.

In the event the district has indebtedness evidenced by bonds and the indebtedness is outstanding and owing on the date of exclusion, the property within any territory excluded from the district shall remain liable for assessment and payment of its pro rata share of the tax therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 233.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. STREAMFLOW PROTECTION STANDARDS [10000. - 10005.]

10000.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) A substantial increase has occurred in the number of requests to appropriate water from the various streams and watercourses of this state, especially for the purpose of generating electric energy.

(b) These requests, if approved without due regard for their cumulative effect on streamflows, could adversely affect, to a serious and significant degree, the fish and wildlife resources dependent on those streams and watercourses.

(c) These fish and wildlife resources are important for the entire state and are inextricably linked to the continued economic viability of industries, such as the fishing industry, which are desirable and important components of the state’s economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1478, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

The Director of Fish and Game shall identify and list those streams and watercourses throughout the state for which minimum flow levels need to be established in order to assure the continued viability of stream-related fish and wildlife resources. The director shall include in this identification list those streams and watercourses the director determines are significant, along with a statement of findings as to why that stream or watercourse was selected. The identification list required by this section shall rank the streams and watercourses beginning with those where the need for establishing minimum flow levels is the greatest. The director, at his discretion, may revise the list and may add or delete streams or watercourses as circumstances require. The initial identification list required by this section shall be completed no later than January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1478, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

The Director of Fish and Game shall prepare proposed streamflow requirements, which shall be specified in terms of cubic feet of water per second, for each stream or watercourse identified pursuant to Section 10001. In developing the requirements for each stream, the director shall consult with the Director of Water Resources, the Director of Parks and Recreation and with all affected local governments. The Director of Fish and Game may also consult with any private individuals, groups, or organizations as the director deems advisable. Upon completion of the proposed streamflow requirements for any individual stream or watercourse, the Director of Fish and Game shall transmit these proposed requirements to the State Water
 Resources Control Board. The State Water Resources Control Board shall consider these
 requirements within a stream as set forth in Section 1257.5 of the Water Code. The Director of Fish and Game shall complete the preparation of proposed requirements for the initial streams not later than July 1, 1989.

The Department of Fish and Game may contract for temporary services for purposes of preparing the proposed streamflow requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 482.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

The Director of Fish and Game, on his or her own motion or at the request of the State Water Resources Control Board, may review any streamflow requirement and may propose revision or modification thereof. The proposed revision or modification shall be transmitted to the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1259, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

The Department of Fish and Game shall initiate studies to develop proposed streamflow requirements for those streams or watercourses in each fiscal year for which funds are appropriated and shall complete studies on each stream or watercourse within three years. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department develop a program that will initiate studies on at least 10 streams or watercourses in each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1259, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall impose and collect a filing fee of eight hundred fifty dollars ($850) to defray the costs of identifying streams and providing studies pursuant to this division.

(b) The filing fee shall be proportional to the cost incurred by the Department of Fish and Wildlife and shall be annually reviewed and adjustments recommended to the Legislature in an amount necessary to pay the costs of the Department of Fish and Wildlife as specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Any user of water, including a person or entity holding riparian or appropriative rights, shall pay the filing fee to the Department
 of Fish and Wildlife upon application to the State Water Resources Control Board for any permit, transfer, extension, or change of point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use, if there is a diversion of water from any waterway where fish reside. No permit, or other entitlement identified in this section, is effective until the filing fee is paid. The State Water Resources Control Board shall, every six months, forward all fees collected to the Department of Fish and Wildlife and provide the location for each entitlement for which a filing fee has been collected.

(d) The fee imposed by this section shall not be imposed on the following applications filed with the State Water Resources Control Board:

(1) Registrations submitted pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with
 Section 1228) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Water Code.

(2) The first application for an extension of time for an individual permit if no change in point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use is included in the application.

(3) Water applications that, in the opinion of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, are filed for administrative and technical clarification purposes only.

(4) Water applications or petitions, the primary purpose of which is to benefit fish and wildlife resources. The determination of the benefit to fish and wildlife shall be made, in writing, by the Department of Fish and Wildlife in order to be exempt from the fee.

(e) If an applicant or petitioner files multiple applications or petitions for the same appropriation, transfer, extension, or change, and the State Water Resources Control Board reviews and considers the applications or petitions together, only one filing fee is required for those applications or petitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 12.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10.1. FARMLAND ACCESS AND CONSERVATION FOR THRIVING COMMUNITIES ACT (FACT CA) [10100. - 10112.]

10100.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Farmland Access and Conservation for Thriving Communities Act (FACT CA).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Section 10112.   Conditionally inoperative on or before July 1, 2041, as prescribed by Section 10112.   Repealed as of January 1, 2042, pursuant to Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

For purposes of this division, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Conservation.

(b) “Farmer cooperative” means an entity that is either a worker cooperative, as defined in Section 12253.5 of the Corporations Code, whose articles of incorporation identify it as such, or a nonprofit cooperative association organized and existing under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(c) “Program” means the Farmland Access and Conservation for Thriving Communities Program established pursuant to this division.

(d) “Qualified entity” means any of the following entities:

(1) A nonprofit organization with tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(2) A public agency.

(3) A farmer cooperative.

(4) A tribal government.

(5) A tribal entity.

(6) An agricultural land trust, the primary purpose of which is the preservation, protection, or enhancement of land in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition or use.

(e) “Qualified farmer
 participant” means a farm enterprise, whose beneficial owners are beginning farmers or ranchers, socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers, or tribal producers, that commits to using practices, methodologies, and techniques that improve soil health, biodiversity, conservation, and long-term sustainability in the production of agricultural crops to be sold in commerce or distributed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Section 10112.   Conditionally inoperative on or before July 1, 2041, as prescribed by Section 10112.   Repealed as of January 1, 2042, pursuant to Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

(a) The Farmland Access and Conservation for Thriving Communities Program is hereby established in the department. The department shall administer the program consistent with Section 93550 and may administer the program through the California Farmland Conservancy Program established pursuant to Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200).

(b) Under the program, the department shall provide grants and related technical assistance to qualified entities for the purpose of acquiring agricultural lands to transfer or provide long-term leases to qualified farmer participants to support agricultural land acquisition and protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Section 10112.   Conditionally inoperative on or before July 1, 2041, as prescribed by Section 10112.   Repealed as of January 1, 2042, pursuant to Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.

Activities eligible for funding through the program may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Acquisition planning and development, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing support to assist with land identification.

(2) Determining zoning and land-use restrictions and verifying water rights and access to irrigation.

(3) Inspecting soil quality, performing environmental reviews, and assessing impacts.

(4) Retaining legal services with regard to acquiring
 agricultural land by qualified entities and the subsequent sale or leasing of that land to qualified farmer participants in accordance with program requirements.

(5) Ensuring compliance for permitting.

(6) Surveying cultural resources.

(7) Testing of water quality and assessing the condition of existing irrigation infrastructure, including well condition and output.

(b) Purchase of fee title to agricultural land.

(c) Purchase of easements, including, but not limited to, conservation easements, reserved interest conservation easements, or cultural access easements.

(d) Technical assistance, including, but not limited to,
 retaining the services of licensed attorneys, real estate brokers, business planning consultants, farmer cooperative management consultants, and property appraisers.

(e) Land improvements that will directly benefit the land and the individuals managing the land and their commitment to conservation and sustainable land use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Section 10112.   Conditionally inoperative on or before July 1, 2041, as prescribed by Section 10112.   Repealed as of January 1, 2042, pursuant to Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.

In providing funding pursuant to the program, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Prioritize funding for activities that benefit socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers.

(b) Prioritize funding to tribal governments and tribal entities to secure agricultural land, including reclaiming ancestral lands, for sustainable food production and stewardship of cultural resources.

(c) Require, and to the extent feasible ensure, that the proceeds of future resale of land continue to be used for purposes of the program.

(d) To the extent feasible, ensure that no more
 than 15 percent of funding provided under the program is used for those expenses described in subdivision (e) of Section 10106.

(e) To the extent feasible, allocate at least 33 percent of funding provided under the program during each grant cycle to tribal governments and tribal entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (SB 178)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Section 10112.   Conditionally inoperative on or before July 1, 2041, as prescribed by Section 10112.   Repealed as of January 1, 2042, pursuant to Section 10112.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.
